Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62J.97] PRIVATE EQUITY COMPANIES AND REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Indirect ownership interest" means an ownership interest in (1) an entity that has an ownership interest in a provider, or (2) an indirect owner of a provider. The amount of indirect ownership interest is determined by multiplying the percentages of ownership in each entity. new text end new text begin (c) "Operational control" means the ability to: new text end new text begin (1) influence or direct the actions or policies of any part of a provider; or new text end new text begin (2) choose, appoint, or terminate a member of the board, manager, managing member, senior employee, consultant, or other individual or entity that participates in the operational oversight of a provider. new text end new text begin (d) "Ownership interest" means possession of equity in capital, stock, profits, or ownership of real estate on which a provider operates. new text end new text begin (e) "Private equity company" means a publicly traded or nonpublicly traded entity that collects capital investments from individuals or entities. new text end new text begin (f) "Provider" means an individual or entity that provides health or medical care services in Minnesota for a fee. For purposes of this paragraph, "for a fee" includes traditional fee-for-service arrangements, capitation arrangements, and any other arrangement in which a provider receives compensation for providing health or medical care services or has the authority to directly bill a group purchaser, health plan company, or individual for providing health or medical care services. Provider includes but is not limited to nursing homes, clinics, hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, dental organizations, physician organizations, and integrated provider and plan systems. new text end new text begin (g) "Real estate investment trust" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 26, section 856. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Moratorium. new text end new text begin (a) A private equity company or real estate investment trust is prohibited from acquiring or increasing any direct or indirect ownership interest the private equity company or real estate investment trust has in a provider after August 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) A private equity company or real estate investment trust is prohibited from acquiring or increasing any operational or financial control the private equity company or real estate investment trust has over a provider after August 1, 2025. This paragraph does not prohibit a private equity company or real estate investment trust from replacing the provider's directors or employees in the normal course of business. new text end